New York, session 2025-2026, A1472.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (r) of subdivision 1 of section 207 of the public 2 health law, as added by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the 3 public health law relating to establishing an Alzheimer's disease 4 outreach and education program, as proposed in legislative bills numbers 5 S. 6504-A and A. 3122-A, is amended to read as follows: 6 (r) Alzheimer's disease and other related dementias; including iden- 7 tification of dementia in health care facilities including but not 8 limited to hospitals, nursing homes, clinics and assisted living facili- 9 ties; community support services, including caregiver support groups and 10 services, respite, and care management; and resources and information 11 concerning Alzheimer's disease and any other dementia related matters 12 that the commissioner [and director of the office for the aging deem] 13 deems appropriate. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 15 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public health law 16 relating to establishing an Alzheimer's disease outreach and education 17 program, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 6504-A and A. 18 3122-A, takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02713-01-5